Utah statutes.
9-4-927.   New housing grants -- Reimbursement from Housing Relief
Restricted Special Revenue Fund.
(1)  Subject to the availability of funds in the Housing Relief Restricted
Special Revenue Fund created in Section 67-4-18, the corporation shall approve
on behalf of the state a grant of $6,000 to a person who:
(a)  purchases a newly constructed, never-occupied residence in Utah using a
30-year fixed interest rate note and mortgage; and
(b)  meets the requirements established in Subsections (2) and (3).
(2)  A person may not receive a grant under this section if the person's
income, as determined by the corporation, exceeds:
(a)  $75,000 for a single person; or
(b)  $150,000 for a married couple.
(3)  The corporation shall establish procedures for determining a person's
eligibility for a grant under this section, including establishing a limit on
the time for which the funds for a grant may remain in escrow, which may not
exceed 90 days.
